Utah statutes.
72-2-206.   Department authority to contract.

The department may, upon approval of the commission:

(1)  make all contracts, execute all instruments, and do all things necessary or convenient to provide financial assistance for transportation projects in accordance with this chapter; and

(2)  enter into and perform the contracts and agreements with entities concerning the planning, construction, lease, or other acquisition, installation, or financing of transportation projects.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

